Washington statutes.
RCW 26.23.039

Insurance company's compliance—Insurance claim data collection organization.

An insurance company may comply with the obligation to exchange information with the division of child support described in RCW 26.23.037(1) by using an insurance claim data collection organization as described in RCW 26.23.037(2).

[ 2021 c 168 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Rules—Effective date—2021 c 168: See notes following RCW 26.23.037.